Virginia statutes. Title 22.1. Education.
Article 6. Textbooks.

§ 22.1-238.
Approval of textbooks.

The Board of Education shall have the authority to approve textbooks suitable for use in the public schools and shall have authority to approve instructional aids and materials for use in the public schools. The Board shall publish a list of all approved textbooks on its website and shall list the publisher and the current lowest wholesale price of such textbooks.

Any school board may use textbooks not approved by the Board provided the school board selects such books in accordance with regulations promulgated by the Board.

For the purposes of this chapter, the term “textbooks” means print or electronic media for student use that serve as the primary curriculum basis for a grade-level subject or course.

History.

1980, c. 559; 2002, c. 421; 2008, cc. 430, 615, 663.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2014, c. 440, cl. 1 provides: “§ 1. That all textbooks approved by the Board of Education pursuant to § 22.1-238 of the Code of Virginia, when referring to the Sea of Japan, shall note that it is also referred to as the East Sea.”

Acts 2014, c. 440, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall not affect any textbook approved by the Board of Education prior to July 1, 2014.”

The 2002 amendments.

The 2002 amendment by c. 421 inserted the subsection A designation; and added subsection B.

The 2008 amendments.

The 2008 amendments by cc. 430, 615 and 663 are nearly identical, and in subsection A, inserted “have the authority to” near the beginning of the first sentence, added the second sentence; inserted the subsection B designation and deleted former subsection B relating to basal reader decodability; and added subsection C.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

16 M.J. Schools, §§ 6, 17.

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Selection of textbooks. —

A local school board may select and use textbooks that are not approved by the Board of Education, provided it complies with the Board’s regulations governing such selection. Further, a local school board must give “official approval” of criteria to be used for review and assessment of textbooks at the local level. See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable Robert G. Marshall, Member, House of Delegates, 09-022, 2009 Va. AG LEXIS 32 (7/27/09).

§ 22.1-239.
Basal textbooks.

In approving basal textbooks for reading in kindergarten and first grade, the Board shall report to local school boards those textbooks with a minimum decodability standard based on words that students can correctly read by properly attaching speech sounds to each letter to formulate the word at 70 percent or above for such textbooks.

History.

Code 1950, § 22-297; 1980, c. 559; 1981, c. 190; 2008, cc. 430, 615, 663.

The 2008 amendments.

The 2008 amendments by cc. 430, 615 and 663 are identical, and substituted the present provisions of this section for the former provisions, which read: “No textbook approved by the Board for use in the public schools shall be changed until such book has been in use for a period of not less than six years, subject to renewal from one to four years, unless such book becomes obsolete or unless a change would result in a material decrease in price. The Board may, by agreement with the publisher, permit the substitution of a revised edition of any adopted book at the lowest price such revised edition is offered for sale anywhere in the United States. Whenever such book is so changed, the Board of Education may permit the use of the old books for a period of at least three years from the date of such change.”

§ 22.1-240.
Repealed by Acts 2008, cc. 430, 615 and 663, cl. 2.

Editor’s note.

Former § 22.1-240, which authorized the Board of Education to determine the number of basal textbooks required, was derived from Code 1950, § 22-298; 1980, c. 559.

§ 22.1-241.
Contracts with publishers.

Local school boards shall either enter into written term contracts or issue purchase orders on an as-needed basis with publishers of textbooks approved by the Board for use in the public schools. Such written contracts or purchase orders for textbooks approved by the Board shall be exempt from the Virginia Public Procurement Act (§

2.2-4300

et seq.).The contract price shall not exceed the lowest wholesale price at which the textbook or textbooks involved in the contract are currently bid under contract anywhere in the United States.If, subsequent to the date of any contract entered into by a local school board, the prices of textbooks named in the contract are reduced or the terms of the contract are made more favorable to purchase anywhere in the United States or a special or other edition of any book named in the contract is sold outside of Virginia at a lower price than contracted in the Commonwealth, the publisher shall grant the same reduction or terms to the local school board and give the local school board the option of using such special or other edition adapted for use in Virginia and at the lowest price at which such special edition is sold elsewhere and the contract shall so state.

Contracts and purchase orders with publishers of textbooks approved by the Board shall require the publisher to furnish an electronic file of the textbook in the National Instructional Materials Accessibility Standards (NIMAS) format that will then be deposited in the National Instructional Materials Access Center (NIMAC) from which accessible versions of the particular textbook may be produced for students with print disabilities, as defined in 20 U.S.C. § 1474. Publishers shall deliver the NIMAS file of the textbook on or before the date of delivery of the regular text version.Contracts and purchase orders with publishers of textbooks approved by the Board for use in grades 6-12 shall allow for the purchase of printed textbooks, printed textbooks with electronic files, or electronic textbooks separate and apart from printed versions of the same textbook. Each school board shall have the authority to purchase an assortment of textbooks in any of the three forms listed above.

Every school board shall order directly from the respective publishers the textbooks needed to supply the public schools in the school division. The publishers shall ship the textbooks to the school board. The purchase price of such textbooks shall be paid directly to the publishers by the school board.

With the approval of the local school board and the publisher, any private school within the school division that so requests may purchase from the local school board’s contract with the publisher. Such private school shall be fully responsible for ordering, purchasing, and receiving shipments of books to be provided from the publisher pursuant to this section. The local school board shall be immune from any civil liability as a result of a private school purchasing from the local school board’s contract.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 22-299, 22-300, 22-301, 22-303; 1977, c. 85; 1980, c. 559; 1995, c. 750; 2008, cc. 430, 615, 663; 2010, c. 97.

The 2008 amendments.

The 2008 amendments by cc. 430, 615 and 663 are nearly identical, and rewrote subsection A, which read: “The Board of Education shall enter into written contracts with publishers of textbooks approved by it for use in the public schools”; in the second paragraph, deleted the subsection B designation at the beginning , deleted “free on board publisher” following “lowest wholesale price” and deleted the second sentence, which read: “The Board shall stipulate the price at which school boards may sell the book or books, which price shall in no case exceed fifteen percent added to the wholesale price”; in the third paragraph, deleted the subsection C designation; substituted “local school board” for “Board” three times, substituted “contracted in the Commonwealth” for “bid in this Commonwealth,” and deleted “in the discretion of the Board of Education” following “the publisher shall”; deleted former subsections D and E, relating to sample copies and Braille versions; and added subsections B and C. In addition, c. 663 added subsection D.

The 2010 amendments.

The 2010 amendment by c. 97 substituted “the textbook or textbooks” for “the book or books” in the second paragraph of subsection A; added the second paragraph of subsection B; and substituted “textbooks” for “books” in the third paragraph of subsection A and in subsection C.

§ 22.1-242.
State Board to adopt regulations.

The Board shall adopt regulations governing (i) the purchase of textbooks approved by it for use in the public schools directly from the publishers by school boards and (ii) the distribution of such textbooks for the use by children attending public schools in Virginia.

History.

Code 1950, § 22-304; 1980, c. 559; 2008, cc. 430, 615, 663.

The 2008 amendments.

The 2008 amendments by cc. 430, 615 and 663 rewrote the section.

§ 22.1-243.
Distribution of textbooks; charges for loss or damage; consumable materials.

Each school board shall provide, free of charge, such textbooks required for courses of instruction for each child attending public schools. However, a local school board may assess a reasonable fee or charge for damages or loss of school property when such property has been provided to students without charge.

Consumable materials such as workbooks, writing books, and drawing books may be purchased by school boards and either provided to students at no cost or sold to students at a retail price not to exceed seven percent added to the publisher’s price. If sold, the local school board shall develop a policy ensuring that workbooks, writing books, and drawing books are furnished to students who are unable to afford them at a reduced price or free of charge.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to authorize a school board to charge fees to students for instructional materials, textbooks, or other materials used by a school board employee that are not directly used by a public school student.

History.

Code 1950, § 22-305; 1980, c. 559; 2008, cc. 430, 615, 663; 2009, c. 81; 2010, c. 85.

The 2008 amendments.

The 2008 amendments by cc. 430, 615 and 663 are identical, and rewrote the section.

The 2009 amendments.

The 2009 amendment by c. 81 added the last sentence in subsection A.

The 2010 amendments.

The 2010 amendment by c. 85 added subsection C.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

16 M.J. Schools, § 6.

§§ 22.1-244 through 22.1-251.
Repealed by Acts 2008, cc. 430, 615 and 663, cl. 2.

Editor’s note.

Sections 22.1-244 through 22.1-251, relating to purchase and order of textbooks, were derived from Code 1950, §§ 22-72, 22-97, 22-295, 22-306, 22-309, 22-310, 22-311, 22-315; 1954, cc. 289, 291; 1956, Ex. Sess., c. 60; 1959, Ex. Sess., c. 79, § 1; 1966, c. 691; 1968, c. 501; 1970, c. 71; 1971, Ex. Sess., cc. 161, 164; 1972, c. 511; 1975, cc. 308, 328; 1980, c. 559; 1993, c. 654.

§ 22.1-252.
Repealed by Acts 1993, c. 654, effective July 1, 1994.

Editor’s note.

This section was contingently repealed by Acts 1993, c. 654. Acts 1993, c. 654, which repealed this section, in cl. 3, provided that the provisions of the 1993 act shall become effective on July 1, 1994, provided the 1994 General Assembly appropriated funds sufficient to cover the state share of such textbooks and workbooks. Sufficient funds were appropriated by the 1994 Session of the General Assembly; therefore, the repeal of this section is effective July 1, 1994.

Former § 22.1-252, relating to free textbook and textbook rental systems, was derived from Code 1950, § 22-307.1; 1966, c. 609; 1980, c. 559.

§ 22.1-253.
Repealed by Acts 2008, cc. 430, 615 and 663, cl. 2.

Editor’s note.

Former § 22.1-253, relating to consumable material such as workbooks, writing books and drawing books, was derived from Code 1950, § 22-314; 1980, c. 559.